Utah, session 2026, SB226.
Section 1. Section 41-6a-520 is amended to read:41-6a-520. Implied consent to chemical tests for alcohol or drug -- Number of tests -- Refusal -- Warning, report.(1)(a)A person An individual operating a motor vehicle in this state is considered to have given the person's consentconsents to a chemical test or tests of the person's individual's breath, blood, urine, or oral fluids for the purpose of determining to determine whether the person individual was operating or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while:(i)having a blood or breath alcohol content statutorily prohibited under Section 41-6a-502, 41-6a-530, or 53-3-231;(ii)under the influence of alcohol, anya drug, or combination of alcohol and anya drug under Section 41-6a-502; or(iii)having any measurable controlled substance or metabolite of a controlled substance in the person's individual's body in violation of Section 41-6a-517.(b)A test or tests authorized under this Subsection (1) must be administered at the direction of a peace officer having grounds to believe that person to have been operating or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while in violation of any provision under Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (iii).(b)A peace officer having reasonable suspicion to believe that an individual was operating or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of an offense described in Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (iii) shall direct that a test be administered as authorized in Subsection (1).(c)(i)The A peace officer determines which of the tests are administered and how many of themtests are administered.(ii)If a peace officer requests more than one test, refusal by a person to take one or more requested tests, even though the person does submit to any other requested test or tests, is a refusal under this section.(ii)If a peace officer requests more than one test, refusal by an individual to take one or more requested tests, even if the individual submits to another requested test or tests, is a refusal under this section.(d)(i)A person An individual who has been requested under this section to submit to a chemical test or tests of the person's individual's breath, blood, or urine, or oral fluids may not select the test or tests to be administered.(ii)The failure or inability of a peace officer to arrange for anya specific chemical test is not a defense to taking a test requested by a peace officer, and it is not a defense in anya criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding resulting from a person's an individual's refusal to submit to the requested test or tests.(2)(a)A peace officer requesting a test or tests shall warn a person an individual that refusal to submit to the test or tests may result in criminal prosecution, revocation of the person's individual's license to operate a motor vehicle, a five or 10 yearfive-year or 10-year prohibition of driving with anya measurable or detectable amount of alcohol in the person's individual's body depending on the person's priorindividual's driving history, and a three-yeartwo-year prohibition of driving without an ignition interlock device if the personindividual:(i)has been placed under arrest;(ii)has then been requested by a peace officer to submit to any one or more of the chemical tests under Subsection (1); and(iii)refuses to submit to anya chemical test requested.(b)(i)Following the warning under Subsection (2)(a), if the person does not immediately request that the chemical test or tests as offered by a peace officer be administered, a A peace officer shall, on behalf of the Driver License Division and within 24 hours of the arrest, give notice of the Driver License Division's intention to revoke the person's individual's privilege or license to operate a motor vehicle if, following the warning described in Subsection (2)(a), the individual does not immediately request that a chemical test or tests be administered as offered by a peace officer.(ii)When a peace officer gives the notice on behalf of the Driver License Division, the peace officer shall supply to the operator, in a manner specified by the Driver License Division, basic information regarding how to obtain a hearing before the Driver License Division.(c)As a matter of procedure, the a peace officer shall submit a signed report, within 10 calendar days after the day on which notice is provided under Subsection (2)(b), that:(i)the peace officer had grounds to believe the arrested person individual was in violation of anya provision under Subsections (1)(a)(i) through (iii); and(ii)the person individual had refused to submit to a chemical test or tests under Subsection (1).(3)Upon the request of the person If an individual who was tested requests so, the results of the test or tests shall be made available to the personindividual.(4)(a)The personindividual to be tested may, at the person's individual's own expense, have a physician or a physician assistant of the person's individual's own choice administer a chemical test in addition to the test or tests administered at the direction of a peace officer.(b)The failure or inability to obtain the additional test does not affect admissibility of the results of the test or tests taken at the direction of a peace officer, or preclude or delay the test or tests to be taken at the direction of a peace officer.(c)The additional test shall be subsequent toafter the test or tests administered at the direction of a peace officer.(5)For the purpose of determining whether to submit to a chemical test or tests, the person to be testedAn individual being asked to submit to a chemical test or tests does not have the right to consult an attorney or have an attorney, physician, or other person individual present as a condition for the taking of any testfor the purpose of determining whether to submit to a chemical test or tests.(6)Notwithstanding the provisions in this section, a blood test taken under this section is subject to Section 77-23-213.(7)If a peace officer investigating a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death of an individual believes there is insufficient probable cause to justify a search warrant authorizing a chemical test described in Subsection (1)(a), the peace officer shall review the facts with a senior officer to confirm that no impairment is suspected and probable cause for a chemical test does not exist.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.